Utah statutes.
75-2-806.   Modification to achieve transferor's tax objectives.
To achieve the transferor's tax objectives, the court may modify the terms of
a governing instrument in a manner that is not contrary to the transferor's
probable intention.  The court may provide that the modification has
retroactive effect.
